test/src/gt-desc-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-desc.gen.yaml
  Noun - juhkkiidsearvi: # ACTORTVder PlGenCmp + GOAHTI-I
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvi, juhkkiid-searvi]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvvit, juhkkiid-searvvit, juhkkiidsearvvik, juhkkiid-searvvik]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: [juhkkiidsearvái, juhkkiid-searvái]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvváš, juhkkiid-searvváš]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvvážaš, juhkkiid-searvvážaš]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvveheapme, juhkkiid-searvveheapme, juhkkiidsearvvihin, juhkkiidsearvvehin, juhkkiid-searvviheapmi, juhkkiid-searvveheapmi, juhkkiid-searvvehin, juhkkiidsearvviheapmi, juhkkiidsearvveheapmi, juhkkiid-searvvihin, juhkkiid-searvviheapme, juhkkiidsearvviheapme]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvválaš, juhkkiid-searvválaš]

  Noun - agibeaiávssis: # FirstComponent + LASIS
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Sg+Nom: [agibeaiávssis, agibeai-ávssis]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Pl+Nom: [agibeaiáksát, agibeai-áksát, agibeaiáksák, agibeai-áksák]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Sg+Ill: [agibeaiáksái, agibeai-áksái]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [agibeaiáksáš, agibeai-áksáš]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [agibeaiáksážaš, agibeai-áksážaš]
    agibeai+N+Cmp#ávssis+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [agibeaiávssesheapme, agibeai-ávssesheapme, agibeaiávssesheapmi, agibeai-ávssesheapmi, agibeai-ávsseshin, agibeaiávsseshin]



  Noun - kantuvradieđáhus: # KANTUR SgNomCmp + JOHTOLAT
    kantuvra+v7+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [konttordieđáhus, konttor-dieđáhus, konttor-dieđahus, konttordieđahus]
    kantuvra+v4+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [kontordieđáhus, kontor-dieđáhus, kontordieđahus, kontor-dieđahus]
    kantuvra+v5+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [gánttordieđáhus, gánttor-dieđáhus, gánttordieđahus, gánttor-dieđahus]
    kantuvra+v6+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [gántordieđáhus, gántor-dieđáhus, gántordieđahus, gántor-dieđahus]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [kontuvradieđahus, kantuvradieđahus, kánttordieđahus, kánturdieđahus, kántordieđahus, gánturdieđahus, gántuvradieđahus, kontuvra-dieđahus, kantuvra-dieđahus, kánttor-dieđahus, kántur-dieđahus, kántor-dieđahus, gántur-dieđahus, gántuvra-dieđahus, kántuvradieđahus, kantovradieđáhus, kántuvra-dieđahus, kántuvra-dieđáhus, konttor-dieđahus, kantovra-dieđahus, gánttordieđahus, gánttor-dieđahus, kontor-dieđahus, konttordieđahus, kontordieđahus, kántuvradieđáhus, kantovradieđahus, kantovra-dieđáhus, gántor-dieđahus, gántordieđahus, kontordieđáhus, kánturdieđáhus, kánttordieđáhus, gántordieđáhus, kantuvra-dieđáhus, gántuvra-dieđáhus, kantuvradieđáhus, kántor-dieđáhus, gánturdieđáhus, gántor-dieđáhus, kontor-dieđáhus, konttordieđáhus, gánttordieđáhus, kánttor-dieđáhus, gántur-dieđáhus, konttor-dieđáhus, kántordieđáhus, kontuvra-dieđáhus, gántuvradieđáhus, kontuvradieđáhus, gánttor-dieđáhus, kántur-dieđáhus]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Loc: [kontuvradieđáhusas, kantuvradieđáhusas, kánturdieđahusas, gántor-dieđahusas, kantovradieđáhusas, kantovra-dieđáhusas, kantuvra-dieđáhusas, kánttordieđáhusas, gánttor-dieđáhusas, kántordieđahusas, kánttor-dieđahusas, gánttordieđahusas, gántordieđáhusas, gántuvra-dieđahusas, gántordieđahusas, gántuvradieđahusas, gántuvra-dieđáhusas, kontordieđáhusas, kontuvra-dieđáhusas, konttor-dieđáhusas, kantovradieđahusas, kántordieđáhusas, kántor-dieđahusas, konttor-dieđahusas, kontor-dieđahusas, kantovra-dieđahusas, kántuvra-dieđahusas, kánturdieđáhusas, gántor-dieđáhusas, gánttor-dieđahusas, gántuvradieđáhusas, kantuvra-dieđahusas, kantuvradieđahusas, kántur-dieđáhusas, gánturdieđáhusas, gánturdieđahusas, kánttordieđahusas, gántur-dieđáhusas, kántuvra-dieđáhusas, kontordieđahusas, kántor-dieđáhusas, kántur-dieđahusas, kontuvra-dieđahusas, gánttordieđáhusas, kántuvradieđáhusas, kántuvradieđahusas, konttordieđahusas, konttordieđáhusas, kontor-dieđáhusas, kontuvradieđahusas, gántur-dieđahusas, kánttor-dieđáhusas]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Ill: [kontuvradieđáhussii, kantuvradieđáhussii, gántur-dieđáhussii, konttor-dieđahussii, kántor-dieđahussii, kantovra-dieđáhussii, gánttor-dieđahussii, gántuvradieđáhussii, gántor-dieđáhussii, kantovra-dieđahussii, kántuvradieđahussii, kontuvradieđahussii, kantuvradieđahussii, konttordieđahussii, kántordieđáhussii, kántur-dieđáhussii, kánttordieđáhussii, kantovradieđahussii, gántuvra-dieđahussii, kánttor-dieđáhussii, konttordieđáhussii, kontuvra-dieđáhussii, gántur-dieđahussii, kántordieđahussii, kántur-dieđahussii, konttor-dieđáhussii, kánttor-dieđahussii, gánttordieđahussii, gántordieđahussii, kantuvra-dieđáhussii, kántuvradieđáhussii, kánturdieđahussii, kontor-dieđáhussii, kontordieđahussii, gántor-dieđahussii, gántordieđáhussii, kontor-dieđahussii, gántuvradieđahussii, kontuvra-dieđahussii, gánttordieđáhussii, gánturdieđáhussii, kántor-dieđáhussii, kántuvra-dieđahussii, kontordieđáhussii, kánttordieđahussii, kantovradieđáhussii, kántuvra-dieđáhussii, kantuvra-dieđahussii, gánturdieđahussii, gánttor-dieđáhussii, kánturdieđáhussii, gántuvra-dieđáhussii]
    
  Noun - čáhppesoasus: # VIELG Attr + MALISLONG
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesoasus, čáhppes-oasus]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Gen: [čáhppesossosa, čáhppes-ossosa, čáhppes-ossos, čáhppesossos]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Acc: [čáhppesossosa, čáhppes-ossosa, čáhppes-ossos, čáhppesossos]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Loc: [čáhppesossosis, čáhppes-ossosis]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Ill: [čáhppesossosii, čáhppes-ossosii]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Com: [čáhppesossosiin, čáhppes-ossosiin, čáhppesossosiinna, čáhppes-ossosiinna]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Nom: [čáhppesossosat, čáhppes-ossosat, čáhppes-ossosak, čáhppesossosak]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Gen: [čáhppesossosiid, čáhppes-ossosiid]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Acc: [čáhppesossosiid, čáhppes-ossosiid]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Loc: [čáhppesossosiin, čáhppes-ossosiin, čáhppesossosiinna, čáhppes-ossosiinna]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Ill: [čáhppesossosiidda, čáhppes-ossosiidda]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Com: [čáhppesossosiiguin, čáhppes-ossosiiguin]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Ess: [čáhppesoasusin, čáhppes-oasusin, čáhppes-ossosin, čáhppesossosin]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesossosaš, čáhppes-ossosaš]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesossosaččaš, čáhppes-ossosaččaš]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesoasusheapme, čáhppes-oasusheapme, čáhppesoasusheapmi, čáhppes-oasusheapmi]
    čáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [čáhppesoasuslaš, čáhppes-oasuslaš, čáhppesoasuslážž, čáhppes-oasuslážž]


  Noun - viežžanolmmoš : # BOAHTINTV SgCmp + FALIS
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Nom: [viežžanolmmoš, viežžan-olmmoš]
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Loc: [viežžanolbmos, viežžan-olbmos]
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Ill: [viežžanolbmui, viežžan-olbmui]

  Noun - uksageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgNomCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: [uksageahči, uksa-geahči]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: [uksageažis, uksa-geažis]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: [uksageahčái, uksa-geahčái, uksageahčii, uksa-geahčii]

  Noun - uvssageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgGenCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: [uvssageahči, uvssa-geahči]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: [uvssageažis, uvssa-geažis]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: [uvssageahčái, uvssa-geahčái, uvssageahčii, uvssa-geahčii]

  Noun - uvssaidgeahči : # GOAHTI-A PlGenCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: [uvssaidgeahči, uvssaid-geahči]
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: [uvssaidgeažis, uvssaid-geažis]
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: [uvssaidgeahčái, uvssaid-geahčái, uvssaidgeahčii, uvssaid-geahčii]

  Noun - niibedilli : # GOAHTI-I SgNomCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibedilli, niibe-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibedilis, niibe-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibedillái, niibe-dillái]


  Noun - niibbidilli : # GOAHTI-I SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbidilli, niibbedilli, niibbi-dilli, niibbe-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbidilis, niibbedilis, niibbi-dilis, niibbe-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbidillái, niibbedillái, niibbi-dillái, niibbe-dillái]

  Noun - niibbiiddilli : # GOAHTI-I PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbiiddilli, niibbiid-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbiiddilis, niibbiid-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbiiddillái, niibbiid-dillái]
